Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-747.01
Jurisdiction to modify child support order of another state when individual parties reside in this state.

(a) If all of the parties who are individuals reside in this state and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of this state has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state's child support order in a proceeding to register that order.

(b) A tribunal of this state exercising jurisdiction under this section shall apply the provisions of sections 42-701 to 42-713.02 and 42-736 to 42-747.04 and the procedural and substantive law of this state to the enforcement or modification proceeding. Sections 42-714 to 42-735 and 42-748.01 to 42-750 do not apply.

Laws 1997, LB 727, § 20;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 84;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 45.

Under this section, the provisions of section 42-746(c) and (d) are applied to a modification proceeding and govern the duration of the obligation of support. Wills v. Wills, 16 Neb. App. 559, 745 N.W.2d 924 (2008).